Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 3

Chancery Divisions Enumerated

16-2-301 — 16-2-317. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 16-2-301 — 16-2-317 (Acts 1931, ch. 80, §§ 3, 4; 1931 (2nd E.S.), ch. 38, § 1; 1935, ch. 148, § 1; 1935, ch. 153, §§ 1, 2; 1941, ch. 12, § 1; 1941, ch. 27, §§ 1, 2; 1941, ch. 160; 1945, ch. 12, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 159, 159.1 (Williams, § 159 and note); Acts 1951, ch. 199, § 1; 1951, ch. 269, § 1; 1953, ch. 140, § 1; 1955, ch. 217, § 1; 1955, ch. 224, § 1; 1955, ch. 255, § 1; 1957, ch. 2, § 2; 1957, ch. 294, § 1; 1957, ch. 377, § 1; 1961, ch. 85, § 1; 1961, ch. 161, §§ 1, 2; 1961, ch. 275, § 1; 1963, ch. 371, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 74, § 1; 1965, ch. 274, §§ 2, 3, 9; 1967, ch. 22, § 1; 1967, ch. 27, § 1; 1967, ch. 54, § 1; 1967, ch. 248, §§ 1, 2, 8; 1967, ch. 295, § 1; 1967, ch. 320, §§ 1, 2, 5; 1968, ch. 429, § 1; 1968, ch. 457, § 2; 1968, ch. 505, § 1; 1968, ch. 561, § 1; 1969, ch. 198, §§ 1-3; 1972, ch. 462, §§ 2, 8; 1972, ch. 863, § 8; 1973, ch. 356, §§ 2, 3; 1974, ch. 547, § 6; 1974, ch. 718, §§ 11, 12; 1974, ch. 783, § 2; 1975, ch. 14, § 1; 1975, ch. 207, § 1; 1975, ch. 295, § 1; 1976, ch. 577, § 2; 1977, ch. 418, §§ 2, 7; 1978, ch. 919, § 1; 1979, ch. 342, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 16-237 — 16-250, 16-252 — 16-254), concerning the enumeration of chancery divisions, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 15, which repealed this part except insofar as this part divided existing circuit, criminal or chancery courts into parts or divisions. It was the intent of the general assembly to create new judicial districts in accordance with § 16-2-506, but to retain and continue the existing parts or divisions of the courts as they are set out.